tex/context/patterns/lang-pl.pat
8f[zacute].
8f[zdotaccent].
8fb.
8fc.
8fd.
8ff.
8fg.
8fh.
8fj.
8fk.
8fl.
8fm.
8fn.
8fp.
8fr.
8fs.
8ft.
8fv.
8fw.
8fx.
8fz.
8g.
8g[cacute].
8g[lstroke].
8g[nacute].
8g[sacute].
8g[zacute].
8g[zdotaccent].
8gb.
8gc.
8gd.
8gf.
8gg.
8gh.
8gj.
8gk.
8gl.
8gm.
8gn.
8gp.
8gr.
8gs.
8gt.
8gv.
8gw.
8gx.
8gz.
8h.
8h[cacute].
8h[lstroke].
8h[nacute].
8h[sacute].
8h[zacute].
8h[zdotaccent].
8hb.
8hc.
8hd.
8hf.
8hg.
8hh.
8hj.
8hk.
8hl.
8hm.
8hn.
8hp.
8hr.
8hs.
8ht.
8hv.
8hw.
8hx.
8hz.
8j.
8j[cacute].
8j[lstroke].
8j[nacute].
8j[sacute].
8j[zacute].
8j[zdotaccent].
8jb.
8jc.
8jd.
8jf.
8jg.
8jh.
8jj.
8jk.
8jl.
8jm.
8jn.
8jp.
8jr.
8js.
8jt.
8jv.
8jw.
8jx.
8jz.
8k.
8k[cacute].
8k[lstroke].
8k[nacute].
8k[sacute].
8k[zacute].
8k[zdotaccent].
8kb.
8kc.
8kd.
8kf.
8kg.
8kh.
8kj.
8kk.
8kl.
8km.
8kn.
8kp.
8kr.
8ks.
8kst.
8kt.
8kv.
8kw.
8kx.
8kz.
8l.
8l[cacute].
8l[lstroke].
8l[nacute].
8l[sacute].
8l[zacute].
8l[zdotaccent].
8lb.
8lc.
8ld.
8lf.
8lg.
8lh.
8lj.
8lk.
8ll.
8lm.
8ln.
8lp.
8lr.
8ls.
8lt.
8lv.
8lw.
8lx.
8lz.
8m.
8m[cacute].
8m[lstroke].
8m[nacute].
8m[sacute].
8m[zacute].
8m[zdotaccent].
8mb.
8mc.
8md.
8mf.
8mg.
8mh.
8mj.
8mk.
8ml.
8mm.
8mn.
8mp.
8mr.
8ms.
8mst.
8mt.
8mv.
8mw.
8mx.
8mz.
8n.
8n[cacute].
8n[lstroke].
8n[nacute].
8n[sacute].
8n[zacute].
8n[zdotaccent].
8nb.
8nc.
8nd.
8nf.
8ng.
8nh.
8nj.
8nk.
8nl.
8nm.
8nn.
8np.
8nr.
8ns.
8nt.
8nv.
8nw.
8nx.
8nz.
8p.
8p[cacute].
8p[lstroke].
8p[nacute].
8p[sacute].
8p[zacute].
8p[zdotaccent].
8pb.
8pc.
8pd.
8pf.
8pg.
8ph.
8pj.
8pk.
8pl.
8pm.
8pn.
8pp.
8pr.
8prz.
8ps.
8pt.
8pv.
8pw.
8px.
8pz.
8r.
8r[cacute].
8r[lstroke].
8r[nacute].
8r[sacute].
8r[zacute].
8r[zdotaccent].
8rb.
8rc.
8rd.
8rf.
8rg.
8rh.
8rj.
8rk.
8rl.
8rm.
8rn.
8rp.
8rr.
8rs.
8rsz.
8rt.
8rv.
8rw.
8rx.
8rz.
8rz[lstroke].
8s.
8s[cacute].
8s[lstroke].
8s[nacute].
8s[sacute].
8s[zacute].
8s[zdotaccent].
8sb.
8sc.
8sch.
8sd.
8sf.
8sg.
8sh.
8sj.
8sk.
8skrz.
8sl.
8sm.
8sn.
8sp.
8sr.
8ss.
8st.
8str.
8strz.
8stw.
8sv.
8sw.
8sx.
8sz.
8szcz.
8szczb.
8szk.
8szn.
8szt.
8sztr.
8t.
8t[cacute].
8t[lstroke].
8t[nacute].
8t[sacute].
8t[zacute].
8t[zdotaccent].
8tb.
8tc.
8td.
8tf.
8tg.
8th.
8tj.
8tk.
8tl.
8tm.
8tn.
8tp.
8tr.
8trz.
8ts.
8tt.
8tv.
8tw.
8tx.
8tz.
8v.
8v[cacute].
8v[lstroke].
8v[nacute].
8v[sacute].
8v[zacute].
8v[zdotaccent].
8vb.
8vc.
8vd.
8vf.
8vg.
8vh.
8vj.
8vk.
8vl.
8vm.
8vn.
8vp.
8vr.
8vs.
8vt.
8vv.
8vw.
8vx.
8vz.
8w.
8w[cacute].
8w[lstroke].
8w[nacute].
8w[sacute].
8w[zacute].
8w[zdotaccent].
8wb.
8wc.
8wd.
8wf.
8wg.
8wh.
8wj.
8wk.
8wl.
8wm.
8wn.
8wp.
8wr.
8ws.
8wt.
8wv.
8ww.
8wx.
8wz.
8x.
8x[cacute].
8x[lstroke].
8x[nacute].
8x[sacute].
8x[zacute].
8x[zdotaccent].
8xb.
8xc.
8xd.
8xf.
8xg.
8xh.
8xj.
8xk.
8xl.
8xm.
8xn.
8xp.
8xr.
8xs.
8xt.
8xv.
8xw.
8xx.
8xz.
8z.
8z[cacute].
8z[lstroke].
8z[nacute].
8z[sacute].
8z[zacute].
8z[zdotaccent].
8zb.
8zc.
8zd.
8zdr.
8zdrz.
8zf.
8zg.
8zh.
8zj.
8zk.
8zl.
8zm.
8zn.
8zp.
8zr.
8zs.
8zt.
8zv.
8zw.
8zx.
8zz.
a1
a2u
a2y
aa2
ae2
ai2
ao2
be2eth
be2f3sz2
be2k1hend
bi2n3o2ku
bi2sz3kop
bi2z3ne2s3m
bi2z3nes
birmin2g1ham
blo2k1hauz
bo2s3ma
br2d
bro2a2d3way
bu2sz3me
buk2sz3pan
busine2ss3m
busines2s
c4h
c4z
cal2d1well
ch2[lstroke]
ch2j
ch2l
ch2r
ch2w
chus1t
cu2r7zon
d[zdotaccent]2[lstroke]
d[zdotaccent]2j
d[zdotaccent]2l
d[zdotaccent]2r
d[zdotaccent]2w
d[zdotaccent]e4z3b
d[zdotaccent]e4z3m
d4[zacute]
d4[zdotaccent]
d4z
deut4sch3land
drz2w
du2sz3past
e1
e2r5zac
e2u
e2y
e3u2sz
ea2
ee2
ei2
eo2
fi2s3harm
fi2sz3bin
fo2k2s3t
fo2r5zac
fol2k1lor
fos2f1a2zot
ga3d2get
gado3p2ta
gol2f3s
golfsz2
gran2d1ilo
gro4t3r
hi2sz3p
hu2cz1w
hu2x3ley
i1
i2[aogonek]
i2[eogonek]
i2[oacute]
i2a
i2e
i2i
i2o
i2u
i2y
in4nsbruck
in4sbruc
j2t1[lstroke]
j2t1r
ja4z4z3b
ja4z4z3m
karl2s1kron
karl2s1ruhe
kir2chhoff
kongre2s3m
led1w
lu2ft3waffe
lu2ks1fer
ly2o
ma2r5z[lstroke]
ma2r5zl
ma2r5zn
mi2sz1masz
mie2r5z[lstroke]
mie2r5zi
mon2t3real
moza2i3k
mu2r7zasich3l
na4[lstroke]3kows
na4r3v
o1
o2y
oa2
och3mistrz
oe2
of2f3set
oi2
oo2
ou2
pa2n3a2mer
pa2s3cal
pa2s3ch
po[lstroke]u3d2ni
po3d4nieprz
po3m2n[aogonek]
po3m2n[eogonek]
po3m2ni
po4rt2s3mo2uth
po4rt3land
poli3e2t
poli3u2re
powsze3d2ni
pr2chal
pre2sz3pa
r4z
ro2e3nt2gen
ro2k3rocz
ro2s3to3c2k
s4z
se2t3le
sko2r5zoner
sm2r
sowi3z2
sy2n3opt
sy2s1tem
sza2sz1[lstroke]y
sze2z1long
sze4[sacute][cacute]
szto2k1holm
szyn2k1was
to3y2o3t
turboo2d3rzut
tygo3d2ni
u1
u2y
ua2
ue2
ui2
uo2
uu2
vo2lk2s3
we2e2k1end
we4st3f
we4st3m
y1
ya2
ye2
yi2
yo2
yu2
ze4p3p
}

% end pattern data
